Alabama, session 2026rs, HB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 22-27-12, Code of Alabama 1975, is
Page 1

Section 1. Section 22-27-12, Code of Alabama 1975, is
HB176 INTRODUCED
amended to read as follows:
"§22-27-12
(a) The department may do the following:
(1) Adopt rules to implement this article.
(2)a. Adopt rules establishing requirements and
restrictions for the management of solid waste, excluding the
collection and transportation of nonhazardous and nonmedical
solid waste.
b. The rules may include factors such as the
characteristics of the solid waste, the potential for
contamination of soils or ground and surface waters, the
design and operation of management facilities, the financial
capabilities of the applicant, soil and geological
considerations, human health, and other environmental
considerations.
c. With respect to solid waste disposal or materials
recovery facilities, the rules may also include factors such
as the quantity, nature, and origin of solid wastes and
recovered materials to be managed.
(3) The department may condition Condition the issuance
of a permit for any solid waste management or materials
recovery facility upon the facility being consistent with
applicable rules as are necessary to carry out the intent of
this article and the department's responsibilities under this
article. Permits shall be issued for a period of time based on
design life of the a facility and may include renewal periods
as determined by rules and not inconsistent with federal law.
(3)(4) Issue permits, notices, and orders, specify the
Page 2

(3)(4) Issue permits, notices, and orders, specify the
HB176 INTRODUCED
terms and conditions of permits or notices, conduct
inspections, require that records be established and
maintained, direct the abatement of unauthorized dumps or
other public nuisances involving solid waste, and implement
the rules and standards adopted pursuant to this article.
(4)(5) Require postclosure activities be conducted in
accordance with the Alabama Uniform Environmental Covenants
Act and the corresponding rules developed adopted by the
department.
(5)(6) Require that solid waste management facilities
identify the volumes and types of solid waste to be managed
and the counties and state where such the solid waste will be
generated.
(6)(7) Enter upon, during reasonable hours, all solid
waste management and materials recovery facilities owned and
operated by persons subject to this chapter to inspect,
investigate, obtain samples, monitor, or observe the transfer,
treatment, storage, or disposal of solid waste and recovered
materials, and to examine or copy records to determine
compliance with this article and the rules promulgated adopted
under this article.
(7)(8) No later than April 15, 2010, require Require
that operators of all public solid waste management facilities
be certified. The department shall, by rule or regulation,
shall establish qualifications for certification programs, to
include including variance procedures for existing programs
which that meet the qualifications and while taking into
account the types of solid waste management facilities.
Page 3

account the types of solid waste management facilities.
HB176 INTRODUCED
(8)(9) Promote, initiate, conduct, and support
research, demonstration projects, and investigations and
participate in all state agency research programs pertaining
to solid waste handling, disposal, materials recovery, and
energy recovery systems.
(9)(10) Promulgate Adopt rules to ban certain wastes
from landfilling or incineration in order to protect the
public health and environment and to promote recycling.
(10)(11) Regulate the management, including collection
and transportation, of all medical waste, until such time as
the United States Environmental Protection Agency may
establish establishes specific rules which that are applicable
within the state for infectious waste under Subtitle C of the
federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42
U.S.C. §6901, et seq., as amended.
100 (11)(12) Do Take any and all other actions not
101 inconsistent with this article or other state law which it
102 that the department deems necessary and proper for the
103 effective enforcement of this article and the rules
104 promulgated adopted pursuant to it this article.
105 (b)(1) Not later than January 1, 2027, the department
106 shall adopt rules that provide for the beneficial reuse of
107 foundry sand. The rules shall provide that foundry sand may be
108 used as any of the following:
109 a. Raw material in the manufacture of asphalt, cement,
110 and concrete products.
111 b. Subbase for hard-surface road construction.
112 c. Fill Material.
Page 4

c. Fill Material.
HB176 INTRODUCED
113 d. Filler for sandbags used for emergency flood
114 control.
115 e. Leachate control drainage material at sanitary
116 landfills.
117 f. Alternative cover material at sanitary landfills.
118 (2) For purposes of this subsection, the term "foundry
119 sand" means a solid by-product from the foundry industry that
120 is derived from molding, core-making, and casting cleaning
121 processes that primarily contains sand, olivine, or clay and
122 this is suitable for disposal as a solid waste in a sanitary
123 landfill."
124 Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
125 2026.
Page 5